Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,236
Insurance policy; requirements; delivery; notice of alteration or cancellation.

(1) An elevator contractor shall submit to the State Fire Marshal an insurance policy, or certified copy thereof, issued by an insurance company authorized to do business in the state to provide general liability coverage of at least one million dollars for injury or death of any one person and one million dollars for injury or death of any number of persons in any one occurrence and to provide coverage of at least five hundred thousand dollars for property damage in any one occurrence and workers' compensation insurance coverage as required under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act.

(2) Such policies, or certified copies thereof, shall be delivered to the State Fire Marshal before or at the time of the issuance of a license. In the event of any material alteration or cancellation of any policy, at least ten days' notice thereof shall be given to the State Fire Marshal.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 27;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2527;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 72.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.